en: Depilatory wax
ar: شمع مزيل للشعر
az: Depilýasiya mumu
bg: Кола маска
cs: Depilační vosk
da: Voks til hårfjerning
de: Enthaarungswachs
el: Αποτριχωτικό κερί
es: Cera depilatoria
et: Depilatsioonivaha
fa: موم موبر
fi: Ihokarvojen poistovaha
fr: Cire épilatoire
ga: Céir bhaint gruaige
hr: Vosak za depilaciju
hu: Gyantázó viasz
hy: Մազահեռացման մոմ
id: Lilin waxing
is: Vax til háreyðingar
it: Cera depilatoria
ja: 脱毛ワックス
ka: ეპილაციის ცვილი
kk: Эпиляциялық балауыз
ko: 제모 왁스
ky: Депиляциялык мом
lt: Depiliacinis vaškas
lv: Depilācijas vasks
mk: Восок за депилација
ms: Lilin depilatori
mt: Xama depilatorja
nl: Hars
no: Voks
pl: Wosk do depilacji
pt: Cera depilatória
ro: Ceară depilatoare
ru: Воск для депиляции
sk: Depilačný vosk
sl: Vosek za depilacijo
sq: Dylli depilues
sr: Восак за депилацију
sv: Hårvax
sw: Nta ya kunyolea
tg: Муми депилятсионӣ
th: แว็กซ์กำจัดขน
tk: Depilýasiýa mumy
tr: Ağda
uk: Віск для депіляції
uz: Depilyatsiya mumi
vi: Sáp tẩy lông
zh: 脱毛蜡

en: Cold depilatory wax
de: Kaltwachs, Kaltwachsstreifen
es: Cera depilatoria fría, Cera fría
fr: Cire épilatoire à froid
it: Cera depilatoria a freddo, Cera a freddo
nl: Koude hars, Koude ontharingshars
pt: Cera depilatória fria, Cera fria

en: Face depilatory wax
de: Gesichts-Enthaarungswachs
es: Cera depilatoria facial
fr: Cire épilatoire visage
it: Cera depilatoria viso
nl: Gezichts ontharingshars
pt: Cera depilatória facial

en: Shaving
ar: حلاقة
az: Qırxmaq
bg: Бръснене
bn: কামানো
ca: Afaitat
cs: Holení
da: Barbering
de: Rasur
el: Ξύρισμα
es: Afeitado
et: Raseerimine
fa: اصلاح
fi: Parraajo
fr: Rasage
ga: Bearradh
he: גילוח
hr: Brijanje
hu: Borotválkozás
hy: Սափրվել
id: Bercukur
is: Rakstur
it: Rasatura
ja: シェービング
ka: გაპარსვა
kk: Сақал қыру
km: កោរសក់
ko: 면도
ky: Кырынуу
lt: Skutimosi
lv: Skūšanās
mk: Бричење
ms: Bercukur
mt: Tqaxxir
nl: Scheren
no: Barbering
pl: Golenie
pt: Barbear
ro: Bărbierit
ru: Бритьё
sk: Holenie
sl: Britje
sq: Rroje
sr: Бриjaње
sv: Rakning
sw: Kunyoa
tg: Риш тарошидан
th: การโกน
tk: Syrmak
tr: Tıraş
uk: Гоління
ur: شیو
uz: Soqol olish
vi: Cạo râu
zh: 剃须

en: Pre-shave products, Pre-shave
de: Pre-Shave-Produkte, Pre-Shave
es: Productos para antes del afeitado, Preafeitado
fr: Avant rasage
it: Prodotti pre-barba, Pre-barba
nl: Pre-shave producten, Pre-shave
pt: Produtos pré-barba, Pré-barba

en: Aftershaves, Aftershave
xx: Aftershaves
de: Aftershave, Rasierwasser
es: Lociones para después del afeitado, Aftershave
fr: Aftershaves, Après-rasage, Aftershave, Après-rasages
it: Dopobarba
nl: Aftershave

en: Aftershave lotions, After-shave lotions
ar: غسول بعد الحلاقة
az: Tıraşdan sonra losyon
bg: Лосион след бръснене
bn: আফটারশেভ লোশন
ca: Locions per després de l'afaitat
cs: Voda po holení
da: Aftershave lotion
de: Aftershave-Lotion
el: Λοσιόν για μετά το ξύρισμα
es: Loción para después del afeitado
et: Pärast raseerimist losjoon
fa: لوسیون بعد از اصلاح
fi: Parranajon jälkeen käytettävä lotion
fr: Lotion post-rasage
ga: Lóis iar-bhearrtha
he: תחליב לאחר גילוח
hr: Losion poslije brijanja
hu: Borotválkozás utáni arcszesz
hy: Սափրվելուց հետո լոսյոն
id: Losion setelah bercukur
it: Lozione dopobarba
ja: アフターシェーブローション
ka: პარსვის შემდგომი ლოსიონი
kk: Сақалдан кейінгі лосьон
km: ឡេលាបក្រោយកោរ
ko: 애프터 셰이브 로션
ky: Кырынгандан кийинки лосьон
lt: Losjonas po skutimosi
lv: Losjons pēc skūšanās
mk: Лосион после бричење
ms: Losen selepas bercukur
mt: Lozjoni ta' wara l-leħja
nl: Aftershavelotion
no: Aftershave lotion
pt: Loção pós-barba, Pós-barba
ro: Loțiune după ras
ru: Лосьон после бритья
sk: Voda po holení
sl: Losjon po britju
sq: Losion pas rroje
sr: Лосион после бријања
sv: Aftershavelotion
sw: Losheni baada ya kunyoa
tg: Лосьон баъди риш
th: โลชั่นหลังการโกนหนวด
tk: Syrylandan soň losýon
tr: Tıraş sonrası losyon
uk: Лосьйон після гоління
ur: آفٹر شیو لوشن
uz: Soqol olishdan keyin loson
vi: Sữa dưỡng sau khi cạo râu
zh: 剃须后乳液

en: Aftershave balms, After-shave balms
ar: بلسم بعد الحلاقة
az: Tıraşdan sonra balzam
bg: Балсам след бръснене
bn: আফটারশেভ বাম
ca: Bàlsam per després de l'afaitat
cs: Balzám po holení
da: Aftershave balsam
de: Aftershave-Balsam
el: Βάλσαμο για μετά το ξύρισμα
es: Bálsamo para después del afeitado
et: Pärast raseerimist palsam
fa: بالم بعد از اصلاح
fi: Parranajon jälkeen käytettävä balsami
fr: Baumes Après-rasage, Lotion Après-rasage, Baume Après-rasage
ga: Balm iar-bhearrtha
he: באלם לאחר גילוח
hr: Balzam poslije brijanja
hu: Borotválkozás utáni balzsam
hy: Սափրվելուց հետո բալզամ
id: Balsam setelah bercukur
it: Balsamo dopobarba
ja: アフターシェーブバーム
ka: პარსვის შემდგომი ბალზამი
kk: Сақалдан кейінгі бальзам
km: បាមបន្ទាប់ពីកោរ
ko: 애프터 셰이브 밤
ky: Кырынгандан кийинки бальзам
lt: Balzamas po skutimosi
lv: Balzams pēc skūšanās
mk: Балсам после бричење
ms: Balm selepas bercukur
mt: Balzmu ta' wara l-leħja
nl: Aftershavebalsem
no: Aftershave balm
pt: Bálsamo pós-barba
ro: Balsam după ras
ru: Бальзам после бритья
sk: Balzam po holení
sl: Balzam po britju
sq: Balsam pas rroje
sr: Балзам после бријања
sv: Aftershave balm
sw: Balsamu baada ya kunyoa
tg: Балзам баъди риш
th: บาล์มหลังการโกนหนวด
tk: Syrylandan soň balzam
tr: Tıraş sonrası balsam
uk: Бальзам після гоління
ur: آفٹر شیو بام
uz: Soqol olishdan keyin balzam
vi: Dưỡng chất sau khi cạo râu
zh: 剃须后香膏

en: Shaving gel
ar: جل الحلاقة
az: Tıraş geli
bg: Гел за бръснене
cs: Gel na holení
da: Barbergel
de: Rasierschaum
el: Τζελ ξυρίσματος
es: Gel de afeitado
et: Raseerimisgeel
fa: ژل اصلاح
fi: Parranajogeeli
fr: Gel de rasage
ga: Glóthach bearrtha
hr: Gel za brijanje
hu: Borotvazselé
hy: Սափրվելու գել
id: Gel cukur
is: Rakgel
it: Gel da barba
ja: シェービングジェル
ka: პარსვის გელი
kk: Сақал алуға арналған гель
ko: 쉐이빙 젤
ky: Кыруу гели
lt: Skutimosi gelis
lv: Skūšanās želeja
mk: Гел за бричење
ms: Gel pencukur
mt: Ġel tal-leħja
nl: Scheergel
no: Barbergele
pl: Żel do golenia
pt: Gel de barbear
ro: Gel de ras
ru: Гель для бритья
sk: Gél na holenie
sl: Gel za britje
sq: Xhel rroje
sr: Гел за бријање
sv: Raggel
sw: Gel ya kunyoa
tg: Гели ришдоркунӣ
th: เจลโกนหนวด
tk: Syrmak üçin gel
tr: Tıraş jeli
uk: Гель для гоління
uz: Soqol olish geli
vi: Gel cạo râu
zh: 剃须啫喱

en: Shaving foam
ar: رغوة حلاقة
az: Tıraş köpüyü
bg: Пяна за бръснене
bn: শেভিং ফোম
ca: Escuma d'afaitar
cs: Pěna na holení
da: Barberskum
el: Αφρός ξυρίσματος
es: Espuma de afeitar
et: Habemeajamiskreem
fa: فوم اصلاح
fi: Parranajovaahto
fr: Mousse à raser, crème à raser
ga: Cúm bearrtha
he: קצף גילוח
hr: Pjena za brijanje
hu: Borotvahab
hy: Սափրվելու փրփուր
id: Busa cukur
is: Rakfroða
it: Schiuma da barba
ja: シェービングフォーム
ka: პარსვის ქაფი
kk: Сақал алуға арналған көбік
km: ហ្វូមកោរ
ko: 쉐이빙 폼
ky: Кыруу көбүгү
lt: Skutimosi putos
lv: Skūšanās putas
mk: Пена за бричење
ms: Buih pencukur
mt: Fowm tal-leħja
nl: Scheerschuim
no: Barberskum
pl: Pianka do golenia
pt: Espuma de barbear
ro: Spumă de ras
ru: Пена для бритья
sk: Pena na holenie
sl: Pena za britje
sq: Shkumë rroje
sr: Пена за бријање
sv: Raktvål
sw: Povu la kunyoa
tg: Кафки риштарошӣ
th: โฟมโกนหนวด
tk: Syrmak köpügi
tr: Tıraş köpüğü
uk: Піна для гоління
ur: شیو کرنے والا جھاگ
uz: Soqol olish uchun ko'pik
vi: Bọt cạo râu
zh: 剃须泡沫

en: Shaving soaps, Shaving soap
ar: صابون الحلاقة
az: Tıraş sabunları
bg: Сапуни за бръснене
bn: শেভিং সাবান
ca: Sabons d'afaitar
cs: Mýdla na holení
da: Barbersæber
de: Rasierseifen
el: Σαπούνια ξυρίσματος
es: Jabones de afeitar
et: Raseerimisseebid
fa: صابون اصلاح
fi: Parranajosaippuat
fr: Savons à raser, Savon à raser, Savons à barbe, Savon à barbe
ga: Gallúnacha bearrtha
he: סבוני גילוח
hr: Sapuni za brijanje
hu: Borotvaszappanok
hy: Սափրվելու օճառներ
id: Sabun cukur
is: Rakburðarsápur
it: Saponi da barba
ja: シェービングソープ
ka: პარსვის საპნები
kk: Сақал алу сабындары
km: សាប៊ូកោរ
ko: 면도 비누
ky: Кыруу самындары
lt: Skutimosi muilai
lv: Skūšanās ziepes
mk: Сапуни за бричење
ms: Sabun pencukur
mt: Sapun tas-shaving
nl: Scheerzepen
no: Barbersåper
pl: Mydła do golenia
pt: Sabões de barbear
ro: Săpunuri de ras
ru: Мыло для бритья
sk: Mydlá na holenie
sl: Mila za britje
sq: Sapunë rroje
sr: Сапуни за бријање
sv: Raklödder
sw: Sabuni za kunyoa
tg: Соуни риштарошӣ
th: สบู่โกนหนวด
tk: Syrmak sabynlary
tr: Tıraş sabunları
uk: Мило для гоління
ur: شیو کرنے والے صابن
uz: Soqol olish sovunlari
vi: Xà phòng cạo râu
zh: 剃须皂

en: Body
de: Körper
es: Cuerpo
fr: Corps
it: Corpo
nl: Lichaam
pt: Corpo

en: Body milks
ar: حليب الجسم
az: Bədən sütləri
bg: Мляко за тяло
bn: বডি মিল্ক
ca: Llets corporals
cs: Tělová mléka
da: Bodylotion
de: Körpermilch
el: Γαλακτώματα σώματος
es: Leches corporales
et: Kehapiimad
fa: شیر بدن
fr: Laits pour le corps, laits corporels, Lait pour le corps, Lait corporel
ga: Bainne coirp
he: חלב גוף
hr: Mlijeko za tijelo
hu: Testápoló tejek
hy: Մարմնի կաթ
id: Susu tubuh
it: Latti per il corpo
ja: ボディミルク
ka: ტანის რძე
kk: Дене сүті
km: ទឹកដោះគោ
ko: 바디 밀크
ky: Дене сүтү
lt: Kūno pienelis
lv: Ķermeņa pieniņš
mk: Млеко за тело
ms: Susu badan
mt: Ħalib tal-ġisem
nl: Bodymelk, bodymelken
no: Kroppsmelk
pl: Mleczka do ciała
pt: Leites corporais
ro: Lapte de corp
ru: Молочко для тела
sk: Telové mlieka
sl: Mleko za telo
sq: Qumësht për trupin
sr: Млеко за тело
sv: Kroppsmjölk
sw: Maziwa ya mwili
tg: Шири бадан
th: บอดี้มิลค์
tk: Ten süýdi
tr: Vücut sütleri
uk: Молочко для тіла
ur: باڈی ملک
uz: Tana suti
vi: Sữa dưỡng thể
zh: 身体乳

en: Body creams
ar: كريمات الجسم
az: Bədən kremləri
bg: Кремове за тяло
cs: Tělové krémy
da: Bodycremer
de: Körpercremes
el: Κρέμες σώματος
es: Cremas corporales
et: Kehakreemid
fa: کرم های بدن
fr: Crèmes pour le corps, crèmes corporelles, Crème pour le corps, Crème corporelle
ga: Uachtair choirp
hr: Kreme za tijelo
hu: Testápolók
hy: Մարմնի կրեմներ
id: Krim tubuh
it: Creme per il corpo
ja: ボディクリーム
ka: ტანის კრემები
kk: Денеге арналған кремдер
ko: 바디 크림
ky: Дене кремдери
lt: Kūno kremai
lv: Ķermeņa krēmi
mk: Креми за тело
ms: Krim badan
mt: Kremi tal-ġisem
nl: Bodycrèmes
no: Kroppskremer
pl: Kremy do ciała
pt: Cremes corporais
ro: Creme de corp
ru: Кремы для тела
sk: Telové krémy
sl: Kreme za telo
sq: Krema për trupin
sr: Креме за тело
sv: Kroppskrämer
sw: Losheni za mwili
tg: Кремҳои бадан
th: ครีมทาผิว
tk: Ten kremleri
tr: Vücut kremleri
uk: Креми для тіла
uz: Tana kremlari
vi: Kem dưỡng thể
zh: 身体乳霜

en: Foot creams
ar: كريمات للقدم
az: Ayaq kremləri
bg: Кремове за крака
cs: Krémy na nohy
da: Fodcremer
de: Fußcremes
el: Κρέμες ποδιών
es: Cremas para pies
et: Jalgade kreemid
fa: کرم های پا
fi: Jalkavoiteet
fr: Crèmes pour les pieds, Crème pour les pieds
ga: Uachtair coise
hr: Kreme za stopala
hu: Lábkrémek
hy: Ոտքերի կրեմներ
id: Krim kaki
is: Fótkrem
it: Creme per i piedi
ja: フットクリーム
ka: ფეხის კრემები
kk: Аяққа арналған кремдер
ko: 발 크림
ky: Бут кремдери
lt: Kojų kremai
lv: Kāju krēmi
mk: Креми за нозе
ms: Krim kaki
mt: Kremi tas-saqajn
nl: Voetencrèmes
no: Fotkremer
pl: Kremy do stóp
pt: Cremes para os pés
ro: Creme pentru picioare
ru: Кремы для ног
sk: Krémy na nohy
sl: Kreme za noge
sq: Krema për këmbët
sr: Креме за стопала
sv: Fotkrämer
sw: Losheni za miguu
tg: Кремҳои пой
th: ครีมทาเท้า
tk: Aýak kremleri
tr: Ayak kremleri
uk: Креми для ніг
uz: Oyoq kremlari
vi: Kem dưỡng da chân
zh: 护脚霜

en: Body balms and butters, Body butters
fr: Baumes et beurres pour le corps, baumes et beurres corporels

en: Moisturizing creams, Moisturising creams
ar: كريمات مرطبة
az: Nəmləndirici kremlər
bg: Хидратиращи кремове
cs: Hydratační krémy
da: Fugtighedscremer
de: Feuchtigkeitscremes
el: Ενυδατικές κρέμες
es: Cremas hidratantes
et: Niisutavad kreemid
fa: کرم های مرطوب کننده
fi: Kosteusvoiteet
fr: Crèmes hydratantes, Crème hydratante
ga: Uachtair taise
hr: Hidratantne kreme
hu: Hidratáló krémek
hy: Խոնավեցնող կրեմներ
id: Krim pelembab
is: Rakakrem
it: Creme idratanti
ja: 保湿クリーム
ka: დამატენიანებელი კრემები
kk: Ылғалдандыратын кремдер
ko: 보습 크림
ky: Нымдандыруучу кремдер
lt: Drėkinamieji kremai
lv: Mitrinoši krēmi
mk: Хидратантни креми
ms: Krim pelembap
mt: Kremi idratanti
nl: Hydraterende crèmes
no: Fuktighetskremer
pl: Kremy nawilżające
pt: Cremes hidratantes
ro: Creme hidratante
ru: Увлажняющие кремы
sk: Hydratačné krémy
sl: Vlažilne kreme
sq: Kremra hidratuese
sr: Хидратантне креме
sv: Fuktkrämer
sw: Losheni za kulainisha
tg: Кремҳои намноккунанда
th: ครีมให้ความชุ่มชื้น
tk: Çyglylandyryjy kremler
tr: Nemlendirici kremler
uk: Зволожуючі креми
uz: Namlovchi kremlar
vi: Kem dưỡng ẩm
zh: 保湿霜

en: Body oils
ar: زيوت الجسم
az: Bədən yağları
bg: Масла за тяло
cs: Tělové oleje
da: Kropsolier
de: Körperöle
el: Λάδια σώματος
es: Aceites corporales
et: Kehaõlid
fa: روغن های بدن
fi: Vartaloöljyt
fr: Huiles pour le corps, huiles corporelles, Huile pour le corps, Huile corporelle
ga: Ola choirp
hr: Ulja za tijelo
hu: Testolajok
hy: Մարմնի յուղեր
id: Minyak tubuh
is: Líkamolíur
it: Oli per il corpo
ja: ボディオイル
ka: ტანის ზეთები
kk: Дене майлары
ko: 바디오일
ky: Дене майлары
lt: Kūno aliejai
lv: Ķermeņa eļļas
mk: Масла за тело
ms: Minyak badan
mt: Żjut tal-ġisem
nl: Bodyoliën
no: Kroppsoljer
pl: Olejki do ciała
pt: Óleos corporais
ro: Uleiuri de corp
ru: Масла для тела
sk: Telové oleje
sl: Olja za telo
sq: Vajra për trupin
sr: Уља за тело
sv: Kroppsoljor
sw: Mafuta ya mwili
tg: Равғанҳои бадан
th: น้ำมันทาผิว
tk: Ten ýaglary
tr: Vücut yağları
uk: Олії для тіла
uz: Tana yog'lari
vi: Dầu dưỡng thể
zh: 身体油

en: Massage oils
ar: زيت التدليك
az: Masaj yağı
bg: Масажно олио
cs: Masážní olej
da: Massageolie
de: Massageöl
el: Λάδι μασάζ
es: Aceite de masaje
et: Massaažiõli
fa: روغن ماساژ
fi: Hierojaöljy
fr: Huile de massage
ga: Ola suathaireachta
hr: Ulje za masažu
hu: Masszázsolaj
hy: Մերսման յուղ
id: Minyak pijat
is: Nuddaolía
it: Olio da massaggio
ja: マッサージオイル
ka: მასაჟის ზეთი
kk: Массаж майы
ko: 마사지 오일
ky: Массаж майы
lt: Masažinis aliejus
lv: Masāžas eļļa
mk: Масло за масажа
ms: Minyak urut
mt: Żejt tal-massaġġi
nl: Massageolie
no: Massasjeolje
pl: Olejek do masażu
pt: Óleo de massagem
ro: Ulei de masaj
ru: Массажное масло
sk: Masážny olej
sl: Masažno olje
sq: Vaj masazhi
sr: Уље за масажу
sv: Massageolja
sw: Mafuta ya masaji
tg: Равғани масҳ
th: น้ำมันนวด
tk: Massaž ýagy
tr: Masaj yağı
uk: Масажна олія
uz: Massaj yog'i
vi: Dầu mát-xa
zh: 按摩油

en: Edible massage oils
fr: Huile de massage comestible